Louisiana, session 2026, HB1088.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:303.1(B)(5) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 47:305.82
is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§303.1. Direct Payment Numbers
* * *
B.
* * *
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1088 ENROLLED
(5) A DP Number shall be issued to a taxpayer who has entered into an
agreement with the state pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 47:305.73 or 305.82 and
who obtains the required approvals and meets all of the qualifications provided in
this Section except Subparagraphs (1)(a) and (c) of this Subsection. The taxpayer
may possess the DP Number for the entire term of the agreement that the taxpayer
enters into pursuant to R.S. 47:305.73 or 305.82.
* * *
§305.82. Rebate; sales and use tax imposed by any taxing authority for purchases
of equipment and other items used in aerospace facilities and aerospace
activities
A. As used in this Section, the following terms shall have the meanings
ascribed to them in this Subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1)(a) "Aerospace activity" means any act or activity related to the research,
development, testing, manufacture, preparation, launch, operation, reentry, descent,
landing, or post-landing recovery of a launch vehicle, spacecraft, payload, or related
equipment, including but not limited to integration, conditioning, transport, and
associated ground support operations, whether conducted on-site or involving
overflight.
(b) The term "aerospace activity" shall not mean any act or activity related
to general administrative, managerial, or support functions, including but not limited
to human resources, payroll, bookkeeping, accounting, legal, marketing, sales,
information technology support, or other similar office or overhead activities,
regardless of whether these functions are performed on-site at a manufacturing
facility or elsewhere.
(2) "Approved aerospace facility" means an aerospace facility that is located
in Louisiana and certified by Louisiana Economic Development in accordance with
the provisions of this Section.
(3) "Approved aerospace facility contractor" means all of the following:
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1088 ENROLLED
(a) A contractor or subcontractor purchasing, leasing, operating, or
maintaining the approved aerospace facility.
(b) A contractor or subcontractor providing services for the construction,
repair, maintenance, or improvement of the approved aerospace facility or equipment
used in aerospace activities at an approved aerospace facility.
(4) "Approved aerospace facility owner" means the entity that enters into the
agreement with Louisiana Economic Development as provided for in this Section.
(5) "Department" means the Department of Revenue.
B.(1)(a) Subject to the limitations provided in Subparagraph (b) of this
Paragraph, an approved aerospace facility owner or approved aerospace facility
contractor shall be eligible for a rebate, to be paid annually, of sales and use taxes
of any taxing authority paid for the purchase, lease, rental, or use of machinery,
equipment, materials, supplies, or services used directly in aerospace activities at an
approved aerospace facility.
(b) Only purchases made on or after July 1, 2026, shall be eligible for the
rebate authorized in this Subsection.
(2) To be certified as an approved aerospace facility by Louisiana Economic
Development, the aerospace facility owner shall provide a sworn attestation that the
project will create a minimum of two hundred new direct, permanent, full-time jobs
in Louisiana and intends to expend at least one billion dollars in new capital
investment in Louisiana on or after July 1, 2026, but before July 1, 2031.
(3)(a) A facility that has been certified as an approved aerospace facility
shall enter into an agreement with Louisiana Economic Development that comports
with the requirements of this Paragraph.
(b) The agreement shall provide a term of rebate eligibility with an initial
term of twenty years, a list of all eligible recipients of the rebate, and language that
authorizes the state to terminate the agreement and recapture any rebates if the
approved aerospace facility fails to fulfill, or if Louisiana Economic Development
determines that the facility will be unable to fulfill its statutory and contractual
obligations. Failure to create a minimum of two hundred new direct, permanent,
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1088 ENROLLED
full-time jobs in Louisiana or to expend one billion dollars in new capital investment
in Louisiana by July 1, 2031, shall result in the termination of the rebate agreement
with Louisiana Economic Development.
(c) Upon the expiration of the initial term of the agreement, Louisiana
Economic Development may renew the agreement for an additional ten years.
(d) Louisiana Economic Development may include in the agreement any
additional conditions that it deems appropriate.
(4) An approved aerospace facility shall be issued a Direct Payment Number
in accordance with the applicable provisions of R.S. 47:303.1.
(5) The department may utilize any collection remedy authorized by R.S.
47:1561.2 for any rebates subject to recapture based on termination of the agreement
with Louisiana Economic Development or a determination that the purchase did not
qualify for the rebate. If a rebate is subject to recapture, the approved aerospace
facility owner shall reimburse the department or its agent for any costs incurred.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, recapture of a rebate based on
a termination of the agreement may be initiated within the later of a time period set
forth in R.S. 47:1561.2 or two years after the date of termination of the agreement.
C.(1) Requests for the rebate of sales and use taxes levied by taxing
authorities pursuant to the provisions of this Section shall be processed by the
department. A taxpayer shall request a rebate of state tax using a form and in the
manner prescribed by the department.
(2) A taxpayer who requests a rebate pursuant to Subsection B of this
Section shall do all of the following:
(a) Obtain certification from Louisiana Economic Development that the
aerospace facility is an approved aerospace facility eligible to receive a rebate. A
copy of the certification shall be submitted to the department with the rebate request.
(b) Submit documentation to the department evidencing the purchases
eligible for the rebate.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1088 ENROLLED
D.(1) Requests for the rebate of local sales and use taxes pursuant to the
provisions of this Section shall be processed by the appropriate local taxing
authority. A taxpayer shall claim a rebate of local tax using a form and in the manner
required by the local taxing authority.
(2) A taxpayer who requests a rebate pursuant to Subsection B of this
Section shall submit documentation to the local taxing authority evidencing the
purchases eligible for the rebate.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.